trunk/apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
    <pardef n="کا/ستن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ستند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ست</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هد</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هیم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هم</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هید</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هی</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هند</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هد</l>
          <r>ستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="پر/یدن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یدیم</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یدم</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یدید</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یدی</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یدند</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>د</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>د</l>
          <r>یدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="بریدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>بر</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خواستن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>خوا</i><par n="کا/ستن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کاستن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>کا</i><par n="کا/ستن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پوشیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پوش</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوابیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>خواب</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خریدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>خر</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فهمیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>فهم</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دریدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>در</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بخشیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>بخش</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پریدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>پر</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="رسیدن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>رس</i><par n="پر/یدن__vblex"/></e>
